Idaho, session 2025, S1030.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 3-409, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
3-409. LICENSE FEES AND APPROPRIATIONS. (1) Every person practicing,
or holding himself out as practicing law within this state, or holding him-
self out to the public as a person qualified to practice or carry on the call-
ing of a lawyer within this state, except state and United States judges of
the courts of record within this state, shall, prior to so doing and no later
than February 1 of each year pay to the board of commissioners of the Idaho
state bar a license fee as provided in this section.
(2) For the year 2011 2025, license fees shall be in the following
amounts:
(a) Active members and house counsel:
(i) For the calendar year of admission to the practice of law in
the state of Idaho if admitted prior to July 1: one hundred fifty-
five dollars ($155) one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175);
(ii) For the calendar year of admission to the practice of law in
the state of Idaho if admitted after July 1: one hundred dollars
($100) one hundred fifteen dollars ($115);
(iii) Each year for the next three (3) calendar years following
the calendar year of admission: two hundred eighty-five dollars
($285) three hundred twenty dollars ($320);
(iv) Each year after the third full year of admission: three
hundred eighty dollars ($380) four hundred twenty-five dollars
($425);
(v) Each year following the calendar year of the lawyer's sev-
enty-second birthday: sixty dollars ($60.00) seventy dollars
($70.00).
(b) Affiliate Inactive and emeritus members:
(i) For each calendar year: one hundred thirty-five dollars
($135) one hundred fifty dollars ($150);
(ii) Each year following the calendar year of the lawyer's sev-
enty-second birthday: sixty dollars ($60.00) seventy dollars
($70.00).
(c) Senior members: for each calendar year, seventy dollars ($70.00).
(3) For the year 2012 2026 and each year thereafter, license fees shall
be in the following amounts:
(a) Active members and house counsel:


(i) For the calendar year of admission to the practice of law in
the state of Idaho if admitted prior to July 1: one hundred sev-
enty-five dollars ($175) two hundred dollars ($200);
(ii) For the calendar year of admission to the practice of law in
the state of Idaho if admitted after July 1: one hundred fifteen
dollars ($115) one hundred thirty dollars ($130);
(iii) Each year for the next three (3) calendar years following the
calendar year of admission: three hundred twenty dollars ($320)
three hundred fifty dollars ($350);
(iv) Each year after the third full year of admission: four hun-
dred twenty-five dollars ($425) four hundred eighty-five dollars
($485);
(v) Each year following the calendar year of the lawyer's sev-
enty-second birthday: seventy dollars ($70.00) eighty dollars
($80.00).
(b) Inactive and emeritus members:
(i) For each calendar year: one hundred fifty dollars ($150) one
hundred seventy dollars ($170);
(ii) Each year following the calendar year of the lawyer's sev-
enty-second birthday: seventy dollars ($70.00) eighty dollars
($80.00).
(c) Senior members: for each calendar year, seventy dollars ($70.00)
eighty dollars ($80.00).
(4) The moneys thus collected, together with other revenues shall be
administered under the direction of the board of commissioners of the Idaho
state bar for the purpose of administering the Idaho state bar, encouraging
local bar associations, promoting legal education seminars, fostering re-
lations between the public and the bar and for the purpose of establishing
and maintaining a clients' assistance fund which shall be administered by
the Idaho state bar commissioners under rules approved by the supreme court,
provided that the clients' assistance fund shall be funded by assessment of
the members of the Idaho state bar not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per
member per year, independent of the license fee. All moneys received and ex-
pended by the commissioners of the Idaho state bar shall be audited annually
by a certified public accountant.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.